Illinois, session 104th, HB3402.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Physical Therapy Act is amended by 5changing Section 1.3 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 90/1.3)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)8    Sec. 1.3. Telehealth services.9    (a) Physical therapy through telehealth services may be 10used to address access issues to care, enhance care delivery, 11or increase the physical therapist's ability to assess and 12direct the patient's performance in the patient's own 13environment. 14    (b) A physical therapist or physical therapist assistant 15working under the general supervision of a physical therapist 16may provide physical therapy through telehealth services 17pursuant to the terms and use defined in the Telehealth Act and 18the Illinois Insurance Code subject to the following 19conditions: 20        (1) Initial physical therapy evaluations without a 21    referral or established diagnosis may only be performed by 22    a licensed physical therapist and may be performed via 23    telehealth when the physical therapist determines that an   HB3402- 2 -LRB104 12204 AAS 22309 b1    in-person examination is not required based on the 2    physical therapist's clinical judgment and the applicable 3    standard of care. and cannot be performed via telehealth 4    unless necessary to address a documented hardship, 5    including, but not limited to, geographical, physical, or 6    weather-related conditions. 7        (2) A physical therapist or a licensed physical 8    therapy assistant may require the patient to undergo an 9    in-person visit instead of providing telehealth services. 10    The use of telehealth as a primary means of delivering 11    physical therapy must be an exception and documentation 12    must support the clinical justification. 13        (3) A patient receiving physical therapy must be able 14    to request and receive in-person care at any point during 15    their treatment. 16        (4) A physical therapist providing telehealth must 17    have the capacity to provide or be able to facilitate a 18    referral to in-person care within the State of Illinois.19        (5) The standard of care for a patient receiving 20    physical therapy through telehealth is equal to the 21    standard of care for in-person care. 22(Source: P.A. 103-849, eff. 1-1-25.)